Oklahoma, session 2025, SB539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 517.2 of Title 19, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The elected sheriff of each county is the senior


authoritative peace officer of that county. The primary duties of


the sheriff are to keep the peace in the county and to secure and


protect the liberties and security of the residents of the county.


B. A federal employee who is not designated by Oklahoma law as


an Oklahoma peace officer may not make an arrest, search, or seizure

Req. No. 1425 Page 1


in this state without the written permission of the sheriff or


designee of the sheriff of the county in which the arrest, search,


or seizure will occur unless:


1. The arrest, search, or seizure will take place on a federal


enclave for which jurisdiction has been actively ceded to the United


States of America by the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. The federal employee witnesses the commission of a crime,


the nature of which requires an immediate arrest;


3. The intended subject of the arrest, search, or seizure is an


employee of the sheriff’s office or is an elected county or state


official; or


4. The federal employee has probable cause to believe that the


subject of the arrest, search, or seizure has close connections with


the sheriff, which connections are likely to result in the subject


being informed of the impending arrest, search, or seizure.


C. The county sheriff or designee of the sheriff may refuse


permission for any reason that the sheriff or designee considers


sufficient.


D. A federal employee who is not designated by Oklahoma law as


a peace officer and who desires to exercise an exception under


paragraph 3 of subsection B of this section shall obtain the written


permission of the Attorney General for the arrest, search, or


seizure unless the resulting delay in obtaining permission could


cause serious harm to one or more individuals or to a community or

Req. No. 1425 Page 2


would potentially cause flight of the subject of the arrest, search,


or seizure in order to avoid prosecution. The Attorney General may


refuse the permission for any reason that the Attorney General


considers sufficient.


E. A federal employee who is not designated by Oklahoma law as


a peace officer and who desires to exercise an exception under


paragraph 4 of subsection B of this section shall obtain the written


permission of the Attorney General. The request for permission


shall include a written statement, under oath, describing the


federal employee’s probable cause. The Attorney General may refuse


the request for any reason that the Attorney General considers


sufficient.


F. A request to the county sheriff or Attorney General shall


contain:


1. The name of the subject of the arrest, search, or seizure;


2. A clear statement of probable cause for the arrest, search,


or seizure or a federal arrest, search, or seizure warrant that


contains a clear statement of probable cause;


3. A description of specific assets, if any, to be searched for


or seized;


4. A statement of the date and time that the arrest, search, or


seizure is to occur; and


5. The address or location where the intended arrest, search,


or seizure will be attempted.

Req. No. 1425 Page 3


G. The permission may be in letter form, either typed or


handwritten, but shall be countersigned with the original signature


of the county sheriff or designee of the sheriff or by the Attorney


General, to constitute valid permission. The permission is valid


for forty-eight (48) hours after it is signed. The sheriff or


Attorney General shall keep a copy of the permission request on


file.


H. An arrest, search, or seizure or attempted arrest, search,


or seizure in violation of subsection B of this section is unlawful


and individuals involved shall be prosecuted by the district


attorney of the county for kidnapping if an arrest or attempted


arrest occurred, for trespass if a search or attempted search


occurred, for theft if a seizure or attempted seizure occurred, and


for any applicable homicide offense if loss of life occurred.


I. The district attorney of the county has no discretion not to


prosecute once a claim of violation of the provisions of this


section has been made by the county sheriff or designee of the


sheriff, and failure to abide by this mandate subjects the district


attorney to removal in accordance with the provisions of Section


1181.1 et seq. of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


J. Pursuant to the Tenth Amendment to the United States


Constitution, the Legislature declares that any federal law


purporting to give federal employees the authority of a county


sheriff in this state is not recognized by this state, is

Req. No. 1425 Page 4


specifically rejected by this state, and is declared to be null and


void, and of no effect in this state.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1425 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:38:16 AM

































Req. No. 1425 Page 5